Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.380

Anaphylaxis—Policy guidelines—Procedures—Reports.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of health, shall develop anaphylactic policy guidelines for schools to prevent anaphylaxis and deal with medical emergencies resulting from it. The policy guidelines shall be developed with input from pediatricians, school nurses, other health care providers, parents of children with life-threatening allergies, school administrators, teachers, and food service directors.

The policy guidelines shall include, but need not be limited to:

(a) A procedure for each school to follow to develop a treatment plan including the responsibilities for [of] school nurses and other appropriate school personnel responsible for responding to a student who may be experiencing anaphylaxis;

(b) The content of a training course for appropriate school personnel for preventing and responding to a student who may be experiencing anaphylaxis;

(c) A procedure for the development of an individualized emergency health care plan for children with food or other allergies that could result in anaphylaxis;

(d) A communication plan for the school to follow to gather and disseminate information on students with food or other allergies who may experience anaphylaxis;

(e) Strategies for reduction of the risk of exposure to anaphylactic causative agents including food and other allergens.

(2) For the purpose of this section "anaphylaxis" means a severe allergic and life-threatening reaction that is a collection of symptoms, which may include breathing difficulties and a drop in blood pressure or shock.

(3)(a) By October 15, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the select interim legislative task force on comprehensive school health reform created in section 6, chapter 5, Laws of 2007, on the following:

(i) The implementation within school districts of the 2008 guidelines for care of students with life-threatening food allergies developed by the superintendent pursuant to section 501, chapter 522, Laws of 2007, including a review of policies developed by the school districts, the training provided to school personnel, and plans for follow-up monitoring of policy implementation; and

(ii) Recommendations on requirements for effectively implementing the school anaphylactic policy guidelines developed under this section.

(b) By March 31, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction shall report policy guidelines to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to school districts for the districts to use to develop and adopt their policies.

(4) By September 1, 2009, each school district shall use the guidelines developed under subsection (1) of this section to develop and adopt a school district policy for each school in the district to follow to assist schools to prevent anaphylaxis.

[ 2008 c 173 s 1.]